District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.116

Disclaimer.

(a)

The issuance of the bonds is in the discretion of the District. Nothing contained in this subchapter, the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents shall be construed as obligating the District to issue any bonds for the benefit of the Qualifying Schools or to participate in or assist the Qualifying Schools in any way with financing, refinancing, or reimbursing the costs of eligible projects.

(b)

The District reserves the right to issue the bonds in the order or priority it determines in its sole and absolute discretion. The District gives no assurance and makes no representations that any portion of any limited amount of bonds or other obligations will be reserved or will be available at the time of the proposed issuance of the bonds.

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-28, § 16, 52 DCR 8093